California statutes. Public Resources Code
(A) A residential hotel, as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) After the issuance of a certificate of occupancy, a resident’s use or marketing of a unit as short-term lodging, as defined in Section 17568.8 of the Business and Professions Code, in a manner consistent with local law.

(b) (1) (A) A local government shall provide formal notification via certified mail and email to each California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the project site as an invitation to consult on the proposed project, its location, and the project’s potential effects on tribal cultural resources pursuant to one of the following deadlines:

(i) Within 14 days of the application for the project being deemed complete pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(ii) For projects whose applications were deemed complete pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code before July 1, 2026, within 14 days of notifying the local government that the project is eligible to be exempt from this division pursuant to this section.

(B) The formal notification shall include all of the following:

(i) Detailed project information to help inform the consultation, including site maps, proposed project scope, and any known cultural resource studies.

(ii) Contact information for the local government.

(iii) Contact information for the project proponent.

(iv) Notice that the California Native American tribe has 60
 days to request consultation with the local government pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) (A) Each California Native American tribe has 60 days to notify the local government that it accepts the invitation to consult.

(B) If a California Native American tribe chooses not to accept the invitation to consult, or does not notify the local government of its decision within 60 days, the consultation shall be considered to have concluded.

(3) (A) Within 14 days of receiving the notification that the California Native American tribe has elected to consult, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), the local government shall initiate the consultation.

(B) During the consultation, the local government shall act in
 good faith to identify whether a tribal cultural resource could be affected by the proposed project and shall give deference to the tribal information, tribal knowledge and customs, and the significance of the resource to the California Native American tribe.

(C) The project proponent may participate in the consultation with the approval of the California Native American tribe if the project proponent agrees to engage in good faith and comply with the confidentiality requirements of Sections 7927.000 and 7927.005 of the Government Code, subdivision (d) of Section 21082.3, subdivision (d) of Section 15120 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and any confidentiality standards adopted by the California Native American tribe participating in the consultation.

(D) The consultation shall seek to find measures that would avoid significant impacts to a tribal cultural
 resource.

(E) The local government shall document the results of the consultation.

(F) The consultation shall conclude within 45 days of initiation, subject to a one-time 15-day extension upon request by a participating California Native American tribe.

(4) The local government shall include, as binding conditions of the project approval, all of the following:

(A) Any enforceable agreements reached during the project consultation.

(B) All of the following measures, unless there is mutual agreement between the California Native American tribe and the project proponent not to include the measure as a binding condition:

(i) Upon
 request by a California Native American tribe, the project shall include tribal monitoring during all ground-disturbing activities, as follows:

(I) The California Native American tribe shall designate the monitor.

(II) The tribal monitor shall comply with applicant’s site access and workplace safety requirements.

(III) The applicant shall compensate the tribal monitor at a reasonable rate, determined in good faith, that aligns with customary compensation for cultural resource monitoring, taking into account factors such as the scope and duration of the project.

(ii) Tribal cultural resources shall be avoided where feasible, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 21084.3. In furtherance of this requirement, where feasible, the project applicant
 shall provide deference to tribal preferences regarding access to spiritual, ceremonial, and burial sites, and incorporate tribal traditional knowledge in the protection and sustainable use of tribal cultural resources and landscapes.

(iii) All treatment and documentation of tribal cultural resources shall be conducted in a culturally appropriate manner, consistent with Section 21083.9.

(iv) A California Historical Resources Information System archaeological records search and a tribal cultural records search shall be completed for the project site.

(v) A Sacred Lands Inventory request shall be submitted to the Native American Heritage Commission.

(vi) The project shall comply with Section 7050.5 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 5097.98,
 including immediate work stoppage upon discovery of human remains or burial grounds, and treatment in accordance with applicable law and in consultation with the affected California Native American tribe.

(vii) An application of tribal ecological knowledge into habitat restoration efforts undertaken by the project as applicable to the specific environmental context and conditions of the project.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “California Native American tribe” has the same meaning as defined in Section 21073.

(B) “Enforceable agreement” means an agreement between the local government, project proponent, and any California Native American tribe that has engaged in consultation pursuant to this subdivision
 regarding the methods, measures, and conditions for tribal cultural resource identification, treatment, and protection, including consideration of avoidance. Compliance with the enforceable agreement shall be a required condition of approval for the project and its terms must be enforceable against the project proponent by the local government and the California Native American tribe.

(C) “Tribal cultural resource” means a site, feature, place, cultural landscape, sacred place, including a Native American sanctified cemetery, Indian cemetery, or Indian burial area, or an object with cultural value to a California Native American tribe that is any of the following:

(i) Included or eligible for inclusion in the California Register of Historical Resources or the National Register of Historic Places.

(ii) Included in a
 local register of historical resources as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5020.1.

(iii) Identified by the Native American Heritage Commission as a sacred place pursuant to Section 5097.94 or 5097.96.

(iv) Included in a local tribal register.

(c) (1) (A) The local government shall, as a condition of approval for the development, require the development proponent to complete a phase I environmental assessment, as defined in Section 78090 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) If a recognized environmental condition is found, the development proponent shall complete a preliminary endangerment assessment, as defined in Section 78095 of the Health and Safety Code, prepared by an environmental assessor to
 determine the existence of any release of a hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure of future occupants to significant health hazards from any nearby property or activity.

(C) If a release of a hazardous substance is found to exist on the site, the release shall be removed or any effects of the release shall be mitigated to levels required by current federal and state statutory and regulatory standards before the local government issues a certificate of occupancy.

(D) If a potential for exposure to significant hazards from surrounding properties or activities is found to exist, the effects of the potential exposure shall be mitigated to levels required by current federal and state statutory and regulatory standards before the local government issues a certificate of occupancy.

(2) For any housing on the site located within 500 feet of a freeway, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The building shall have a centralized heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning system.

(B) The outdoor air intakes for the heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning system shall face away from the freeway.

(C) The building shall provide air filtration media for outside and return air that provides a minimum efficiency reporting value of 16.

(D) The air filtration media shall be replaced at the manufacturer’s designated interval.

(E) The building shall not have any balconies facing the freeway.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, all construction workers employed in the execution of a housing development project exempt from this division pursuant to this section where 100 percent of the units within the development project are dedicated to lower income households, as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate, regardless of whether the housing development project is a public work.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the labor standards of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4 of
 the Government Code shall apply to buildings over 85 feet in height above grade in any housing development project exempt from this division pursuant to this section.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the labor standards of Article 4 (commencing with Section 65912.130) of Chapter 4.1 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code shall apply for projects of 50 units or greater in the City and County of San Francisco that are not covered by paragraph (2), for any construction craft where at least 50 percent of the units in market-rate multifamily housing projects that received their certificate of occupancy between 2022 and 2024, inclusive, were built by workers that were paid not less than the general prevailing rate of per diem wages.

(B) For purposes of this section, “market-rate multifamily housing development project” means a housing development
 project of greater than 10 units where less than 95 percent of the units are dedicated to lower income households, as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) (i) The eligibility of this subparagraph, by classification, will be determined by the Department of Industrial Relations and published on its internet website by January 1, 2026.

(ii) In making a determination of eligibility pursuant to this subparagraph, the Director of Industrial Relations shall obtain and consider data from the labor organizations and employers or employer associations concerned no later than October 1, 2025.

(iii) To determine the number of market-rate multifamily housing projects that received their certificate of occupancy in a given year, the Department of Industrial Relations shall use the
 annual progress report data as reported by the jurisdiction pursuant to Section 65400 of the Government Code.

(4) The provisions of Section 218.8 of the Labor Code shall extend to the development proponent in addition to the direct contractor or subcontractor. For purposes of this paragraph, “development proponent” shall mean a developer who submits the housing development project application to a local government that is exempt from this division pursuant to this section.

(5) (A) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may undertake any of the following on a housing development project that is exempt from this division pursuant to this section:

(i) Bring an action in a court of competent
 jurisdiction against a contractor or subcontractor at any tier on behalf of construction workers employed by the contractor or subcontractor on a housing development project that is exempt from this division pursuant to this section to enforce Section 226 of the Labor Code. A contractor is not subject to an action pursuant to this subparagraph due to the failure of a subcontractor to comply with Section 226 of the Labor Code.

(ii) Bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction on behalf of an affected employee against an employer for damages as if Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code did not apply, if the employer fails to secure the payment of compensation as required by Article 1 (commencing with Section 3700) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Labor Code.

(iii) In addition to the remedies set forth in Section 7028.3 of the Business and
 Professions Code, on proper showing by a joint labor-management cooperation committee of a continuing violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code by a person who constructs a housing project and does not hold a state contractor’s license in any classification, an injunction shall issue by a court specified in Section 7028.3 of the Business and Professions Code at the request of the joint labor-management cooperation committee, prohibiting that violation.

(B) For any action brought pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall award a prevailing joint labor-management committee its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred maintaining the action.

(C) An action brought pursuant to this paragraph shall be filed within one year of a local government issuing a certificate of occupancy for the housing development project or
 for the portion relating to the action.

(D) This paragraph shall apply only to violations that occur on the site of construction of the housing development project.

(e) This section does not affect the eligibility of a housing development project for a density bonus, incentives or concessions, waivers or reductions of development standards, and reduced parking ratios pursuant to Section 65915 of the Government Code.

(f) If a lead agency determines that this division does not apply to an activity pursuant to this section and determines to approve or carry out the activity, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the county clerk of the county in which the
 activity will occur in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152, as applicable.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Adjoins” includes parcels that are only separated by a street, pedestrian path, or bicycle path.

(2) “Construction worker” means one performing onsite work associated with construction, including work involving alteration, demolition, building, excavation, renovation, remodeling, maintenance, improvement, repair work, and any other work as described by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and other similar or related occupations or trades.

(3) “Urban use” means any current or previous residential or commercial development, public institution, or public park that is surrounded by other urban uses, parking lot or structure, transit or transportation passenger facility, or retail use, or any combination of those uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 650, Sec. 9.   (SB 158)   Effective October 11, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.69.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this division does not apply to any of the following projects:

(1) A project that consists exclusively of a day care center, as defined in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code, that is not located in a residential area.

(2) A project that consists exclusively of a rural health clinic, as defined by Section 1396(d)(l)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or a federally qualified health center, as defined by Section 1396(d)(l)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, if the facility is less than 50,000 square feet in total space.

(3) A project that consists
 exclusively of a nonprofit food bank or food pantry, defined as a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), that solicits, stores, and distributes sufficient food to their defined service area, if the project is located on a site that is zoned exclusively for industrial uses.

(4) A project that consists exclusively of a facility for advanced manufacturing, as defined in Section 26003, if the project is located on a site zoned exclusively for industrial uses.

(b) This section does not apply to a project located on natural and protected lands, as defined pursuant to Section 21067.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 15.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.70.

(a) This division does not apply to a project that consists of the development, construction, or operation of a heavy maintenance facility or other maintenance facility for electrically powered high-speed rail, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The project has been evaluated in a prior project-level environmental impact report prepared pursuant to this division and that prior report evaluated one or more similar high-speed rail maintenance facility sites.

(2) The project incorporates all applicable mitigation measures identified in those prior project-level environmental impact reports.

(3) The
 project site is located within one mile of rail right-of-way approved for high-speed rail service.

(b) This division does not apply to a project that consists of the development, construction, or modification of a proposed passenger rail station, or design changes to a passenger rail station, for the purpose of serving electrically powered high-speed rail, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The station or station design change is located within the resource study area of a previously certified environmental impact report prepared pursuant to this division for a high-speed rail or passenger rail project.

(2) The project incorporates all applicable mitigation measures identified in the previously certified environmental impact report.

(c) For purposes of this section, “high-speed rail” means the California high-speed rail project and other high-speed rail projects in California that are planned to directly connect to the California high-speed rail project.

(d) This section does not apply to any project on or within natural and protected lands as defined in Section 21067.5.

(e) The exemptions provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply exclusively to projects described in those subdivisions and do not exempt any other facilities, structures, or uses not expressly identified. Any other project uses shall be subject to this division unless independently exempt under a separate provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 16.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.73.

Notwithstanding any other law, a housing development project, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code, that meets the following criteria shall be considered a discretionary project, as that term is used in subdivision (a) of Section 21080, and shall not be exempt from this division:

(a) The project is located in a city with a population of more than 85,000 but less than 95,000, as determined by the 2020 Census.

(b) The project is located in a county with a population of more than 440,000 but less than 455,000, as determined by the 2020 Census.

(c) A portion of the parcel where the
 project is located is identified on a United States Fish and Wildlife Service map as freshwater forested or shrub wetland.

(d) A portion of the parcel where the project is located is within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.

(e) The project is located on a parcel adjacent to a California historical landmark on the California Register of Historic Places.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 650, Sec. 10.   (SB 158)   Effective October 11, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.81.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Legislature recognizes the significance of oil and gas production in the County of Kern, while also affirming the state’s commitment to protecting public health, safety, and environmental quality, particularly for communities located near oil and gas operations. 

(2) The County of Kern has adopted an oil and gas permitting ordinance, and in connection with that ordinance, has certified a Second Supplemental Environmental Impact Report (SSREIR) pursuant to this division. The County of Kern’s SSREIR and oil and gas permitting ordinance impose comprehensive mitigations to address potential
 environmental impacts associated with oil and gas production. 

(3) Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 3280) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 establishes health protection zones to safeguard residents from the health risks associated with oil and gas extraction activities. The Geologic Energy Management Division’s approval of a notice of intention under Section 3203 is required before drilling a new oil and gas well. Section 3281 prohibits approval of a notice of intention within a health protection zone absent certain limited exceptions. The Kern County SSREIR does not cover activities within a health protection zone. 

(4) Because the County of Kern’s SSREIR does not cover activities within a health protection zone, the Geologic Energy Management Division is the lead agency under this division for projects that include permits to drill
 or rework an oil and gas well within a health protection zone in the County of Kern, to the extent that those activities might be allowed under Section 3281. 

(b) The Kern County Second Supplemental Recirculated Environmental Impact Report (SCH2013081079), including all appendices (SSREIR March 2025), is hereby deemed sufficient for full compliance with this division for purposes of consideration and adoption of amended Revisions to Title 19 - Kern County Zoning Ordinance Code 2025 (A), Focused on Oil and Gas Local Permitting by the County of Kern. No further environmental review is required under this division for the consideration and adoption of the Revisions to Title 19 - Kern County Zoning Ordinance Code - 2025 (A), Focused on Oil and Gas Local Permitting (SSREIR March 2025), as enacted as of January 1, 2026. Corrections of minor typographical errors and formatting changes to the zoning ordinance version shall not
 require further environmental review. Any other modification to or readoption of the zoning ordinance, however, shall not be covered by this section but rather by the other provisions of this division. 

(c) Projects that satisfy the requirements of Revisions to Title 19 - Kern County Zoning Ordinance Code - 2025 (A), Focused on Oil and Gas Local Permitting, and that are approved by the County of Kern under that ordinance as enacted as of the effective date of this section, or as reenacted to incorporate corrections of minor typographical errors or formatting changes, are deemed sufficient for full compliance with this division and no further environmental review is required under this division, so long as the projects comply with Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 3280) of Chapter 1 of Division 3, as that article read on January 1, 2025. 

(d) This section applies prospectively to any approvals by the County of Kern with respect to the permitting of oil and gas production operations under any adopted local ordinance and associated development and also applies prospectively and retroactively to any causes of action and claims that are pending as of the effective date of this section, and for which no final nonappealable judgment has been entered before that date. 

(e) Notwithstanding Section 21166, the Legislature’s determination in this section that the Kern County Second Supplemental Recirculated Environmental Impact Report (SCH2013081079), including all appendices (SSREIR March 2025), is sufficient for full compliance with this division and shall be final and conclusive for purposes of reliance on that report for its use by any responsible agencies. Reliance on use of that report by any
 responsible agency shall fully satisfy the responsible agency’s obligations under this division and shall not be subject to challenge pursuant to Section 21166. 

(f) No approval may be granted by the County of Kern or the Geologic Energy Management Division in reliance on the Kern County Second Supplemental Recirculated Environmental Impact Report (SCH2013081079), including all appendices (SSREIR March 2025), with respect to any operation located in a health protection zone as defined in Section 3280, regardless of whether Section 3281 is enforceable or independently prohibits that approval. 

(g) The Geologic Energy Management Division shall be the lead agency under this division for projects in the County of Kern that include approval of a notice of intention under Section 3203 to drill or rework an oil gas well within 3,200 feet of
 a residence, educational facility, youth center, health care facility, live-in housing, or any building housing a business that is open to the public, to the extent those projects may be authorized by law. The measurement shall be made from the property line unless the building is more than 50 feet set back from the property line, in which case the measurement shall be made from the outline of the building footprint to 3,200 feet in all directions. 

(h) The Geologic Energy Management Division shall not approve more than 2,000 notices of intention per calendar year to drill new wells in reliance on the Second Supplemental Recirculated Environmental Impact Report (SCH2013081079) as a responsible agency under this section, unless the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission makes a formal finding that additional permit issuance is necessary for in-state crude oil production to supply 25 percent of
 in-state refinery feedstock demand, and that the production would likely help reduce costs for retail consumers of gasoline in the state. 

(i) Because the Kern County Second Supplemental Recirculated Environmental Impact Report (SCH2013081079), including all appendices (SSREIR March 2025), analyzes activities only through the end of 2035, further environmental review is required to satisfy the lead agency’s obligations under this division for any County of Kern ordinance on oil and gas permitting enacted on or after January 1, 2026, unless that ordinance only corrects minor typographical errors and formatting to the zoning ordinance referenced in subdivision (b).

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2036, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 118, Sec. 6.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.

Pursuant to the policy stated in Sections 21002 and 21002.1, no public agency shall approve or carry out a project for which an environmental impact report has been certified which identifies one or more significant effects on the environment that would occur if the project is approved or carried out unless both of the following occur:

(a) The public agency makes one or more of the following findings with respect to each significant effect:

(1) Changes or alterations have been required in, or incorporated into, the project which mitigate or avoid the significant effects on the environment.

(2) Those changes or alterations are within the responsibility and jurisdiction of another public agency and have been, or can and should be, adopted by that other agency.

(3) Specific economic, legal, social, technological, or other considerations, including considerations for the provision of employment opportunities for highly trained workers, make infeasible the mitigation measures or alternatives identified in the environmental impact report.

(b) With respect to significant effects which were subject to a finding under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the public agency finds that specific overriding economic, legal, social, technological, or other benefits of the project outweigh the significant effects on the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1294, Sec. 2.   Effective October 1, 1994.   Note: October 1, 1994, is the date that Ch. 1294 became law without the Governor's signature.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if a residential project, not exceeding 100 units, with a minimum residential density of 20 units per acre and within one-half mile of a transit stop, on an infill site in an urbanized area is in compliance with the traffic, circulation, and transportation policies of the general plan, applicable community plan, applicable specific plan, and applicable ordinances of the city or county with jurisdiction over the area where the project is located, and the city or county requires that the mitigation measures approved in a previously certified project area environmental impact report applicable to the project be incorporated into the project, the city or county is not required to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 21081 with respect to the making of any findings regarding the impacts of the project on traffic at intersections, or on streets, highways, or freeways.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) restricts the authority of a city or county to adopt feasible mitigation measures with respect to the impacts of a project on pedestrian and bicycle safety.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The application for a proposed project is made more than five years after certification of the project area environmental impact report applicable to the project.

(2) A major change has occurred within the project area after certification of the project area environmental impact report applicable to the project.

(3) The project area environmental impact report applicable to the project was certified with overriding considerations pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21081 to the significant impacts on the environment with respect to traffic or transportation.

(4) The proposed project covers more than four acres.

(d) A project shall not be divided into smaller projects in order to qualify pursuant to this section.

(e) Nothing in this section relieves a city or county from the requirement to analyze the project’s effects on traffic at intersections, or on streets, highways, or freeways, or from making a determination that the project may have a significant effect on traffic.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “project area environmental impact report” means an environmental impact report certified on any of the following:

(1) A general plan.

(2) A revision or update to the general plan that includes at least the land use and circulation elements.

(3) An applicable community plan.

(4) An applicable specific plan.

(5) A housing element of the general plan, if the environmental impact report analyzed the environmental effects of the density of the proposed project.

(6) A zoning ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.3.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), a lead agency is not required to evaluate the aesthetic effects of a project and aesthetic effects shall not be considered significant effects on the environment if the project involves the refurbishment, conversion, repurposing, or replacement of an existing building that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The building is abandoned, dilapidated, or has been vacant for more than one year.

(2) The building site is immediately adjacent to parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses or at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed
 with qualified urban uses and the remaining 25 percent of the site adjoins parcels that previously have been developed for qualified urban uses.

(3) The project includes the construction of housing.

(4) Any new structure does not substantially exceed the height of the existing structure.

(5) The project does not create a new source of substantial light or glare.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) A project with potentially significant aesthetic effects on an official state scenic highway established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 260) of Chapter
 2 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(2) A project with potentially significant aesthetic effects on historical or cultural resources.

(c) This section does not alter, affect, or otherwise change the authority of a lead agency to consider aesthetic issues and to require the mitigation or avoidance of adverse aesthetic effect pursuant to other laws.

(d) For purposes of this section, “dilapidated” means decayed, deteriorated, or fallen into such disrepair through neglect or misuse so as to require substantial repair for safe and proper use.

(e) If the lead agency determines that it
 is not required to evaluate the aesthetic effects of a project pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out that project, the lead agency shall file a notice with the Office of Planning and Research and the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 116, Sec. 2.   (AB 356)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.5.

In making the findings required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081, the public agency shall base its findings on substantial evidence in the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1294, Sec. 3.   Effective October 1, 1994.   Note: October 1, 1994, is the date that Ch. 1294 became law without the Governor's signature.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.6.

(a) When making the findings required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081 or when adopting a mitigated negative declaration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 21080, the following requirements shall apply:

(1) The public agency shall adopt a reporting or monitoring program for the changes made to the project or conditions of project approval, adopted in order to mitigate or avoid significant effects on the environment. The reporting or monitoring program shall be designed to ensure compliance during project implementation. For those changes which have been required or incorporated into the project at the request of a responsible agency or a public agency having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the project, that agency shall, if so requested by the lead agency or a responsible agency, prepare and submit a proposed reporting or monitoring program.

(2) The lead agency shall specify the location and custodian of the documents or other material which constitute the record of proceedings upon which its decision is based.

(b) A public agency shall provide that measures to mitigate or avoid significant effects on the environment are fully enforceable through permit conditions, agreements, or other measures. Conditions of project approval may be set forth in referenced documents which address required mitigation measures or, in the case of the adoption of a plan, policy, regulation, or other public project, by incorporating the mitigation measures into the plan, policy, regulation, or project design.

(c) Prior to the close of the public review period for a draft environmental impact report or mitigated negative declaration, a responsible agency, or a public agency having jurisdiction over natural resources affected by the project, shall either submit to the lead agency complete and detailed performance objectives for mitigation measures which would address the significant effects on the environment identified by the responsible agency or agency having jurisdiction over natural resources affected by the project, or refer the lead agency to appropriate, readily available guidelines or reference documents. Any mitigation measures submitted to a lead agency by a responsible agency or an agency having jurisdiction over natural resources affected by the project shall be limited to measures which mitigate impacts to resources which are subject to the statutory authority of, and definitions applicable to, that agency. Compliance or noncompliance by a responsible agency or agency having jurisdiction over natural resources affected by a project with that requirement shall not limit the authority of the responsible agency or agency having jurisdiction over natural resources affected by a project, or the authority of the lead agency, to approve, condition, or deny projects as provided by this division or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1294, Sec. 4.5.   Effective October 1, 1994.   Note: October 1, 1994, is the date that Ch. 1294 became law without the Governor's signature.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.7.

Transportation information resulting from the reporting or monitoring program required to be adopted by a public agency pursuant to Section 21081.6 shall be submitted to the transportation planning agency in the region where the project is located and to the Department of Transportation for a project of statewide, regional, or areawide significance according to criteria developed pursuant to Section 21083. The transportation planning agency and the Department of Transportation shall adopt guidelines for the submittal of those reporting or monitoring programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 867, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21082.
